src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2025 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # North Saami adverbs

LEXICON LADJE     !!= * **@CODE@**
< "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" l:" " á:l d:á j:d e:j 0:e  > adv ; !NOTLEMMA
!ládje+MWE:% ládje adv ;								!NOTLEMMA
láhkai+MWE:% láhkai adv ;  							 !NOTLEMMA
ládjii+MWE:% ládjii adv ;								  !NOTLEMMA
láhkai+MWE+Err/Orth-a-á:% láhkái adv ;					 !NOTLEMMA
ládje+Err/MissingSpace:∑#ládje adv ;				 !NOTLEMMA
láhkai+Err/MissingSpace:∑#láhkái adv ;				 !NOTLEMMA
láhkai+Err/MissingSpace:∑#lahkái adv ;				 !NOTLEMMA
láhkai+Err/MissingSpace:∑#láhkai adv ;				 !NOTLEMMA
ládjii+Err/MissingSpace:∑#ládjii adv ;				 !NOTLEMMA


LEXICON LADJE-ERR-ORTH
ládje+MWE+Err/Orth:% ládje adv ;								!NOTLEMMA
láhkai+MWE+Err/Orth:% láhkai adv ;  							 !NOTLEMMA
ládjii+MWE+Err/Orth:% ládjii adv ;								  !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON DIHTE     !!= * **@CODE@**
< "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:" " 0:d 0:i 0:h 0:t 0:e > adv ; !NOTLEMMA

dihtii:% dihtii adv ;  							 !NOTLEMMA
dihtii+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihtii adv ;  !NOTLEMMA
dihte+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihte adv ;  !NOTLEMMA


LEXICON LAGAadv   !!= * **@CODE@**
 :laga adv ;															   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth-a-á:lága adv ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LAGAIDadv   !!= * **@CODE@**
 :lagajd9 adv ;															   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth-a-á:lágajd9 adv ;													   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LEBBUIplc   !!= * **@CODE@**
 :lebbui adv-plc-comp ;													   !NOTLEMMA
 +Use/NG:labbui adv-plc-comp ;													   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:leabbui adv-plc-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LEBBUItime   !!= * **@CODE@**
 :lebbui adv-time-comp ;													   !NOTLEMMA
 +Use/NG:labbui adv-time-comp ;													   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:leabbui adv-time-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LEAPPOSplc   !!= * **@CODE@**
 :leappos adv-plc-comp ;												   !NOTLEMMA
 +Use/NG:labbos adv-plc-comp ;												   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:lebbos adv-plc-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:leabbos adv-plc-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:leabbus adv-plc-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LEAPPOStime   !!= * **@CODE@**
 :leappos adv-time-comp ;												   !NOTLEMMA
 +Use/NG:labbos adv-time-comp ;												   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:lebbos adv-time-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:leabbos adv-time-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA
+Err/Orth:leabbus adv-time-comp ;											   !NOTLEMMA



LEXICON gadv   !!= * **@CODE@**  adv that can form compounds
+Adv:%> R ;																   !NOTLEMMA
adv ;																	   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON gadv-plc   !!= * **@CODE@**  adv that can form compounds
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> R ;														   !NOTLEMMA
adv-plc ;																   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc:%> RHyph ;

LEXICON IL-adv-plc   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Plc: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Gen: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Loc:is K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Ill:ii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON IL-adv-time   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Time: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Gen: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Loc:is K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Ill:ii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON EL-adv-time
+Adv+Sem/Time:il K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Gen:il K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Loc:elis K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Ill:elii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Pl+Ill:eliidda K ;														   !NOTLEMMA


LEXICON EL-adv-plc
+Adv+Sem/Plc:il K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Gen:il K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Loc:elis K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Ill:elii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill:eliidda K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON AL-adv-time
+Adv+Sem/Time: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Gen: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Loc:is K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Ill:ii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA


LEXICON LAS-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv:aš K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Gen:ačča K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Loc:aččas K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Ill:ažžii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LAS-adv-plc   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Plc:aš K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Gen:ačča K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Loc:aččas K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Ill:ažžii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON LAS-adv-time   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Time:aš K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Gen:ačča K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Loc:aččas K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time+Ill:ažžii K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-plc   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Plc: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-time   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Time: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-time-plc   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Plc: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Sem/Time: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA


!LEXICON multiadv   !!= * __@CODE@__  dan_dihte
!+Adv+MWE: K-ge ; 														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON CSadv   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv: # ;																   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON CSadvFoc/Neg-ge   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Foc/Neg-ge:#ge # ;																   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-subqst   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv: K ;									! NOTLEMMA
+Adv+Subqst: K ;									! NOTLEMMA


LEXICON adv-comp   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Gram/Comp: K ;															   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-sup   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Gram/Superl: K ;														   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-plc-comp   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Gram/Comp: K ;													   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-plc-sup   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Gram/Superl: K ;												   !NOTLEMMA


LEXICON adv-time-comp   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Time+Gram/Comp: K ;													   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON adv-time-sup   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+Sem/Time+Gram/Superl: K ;												   !NOTLEMMA


!LEXICON COMPADV   !!= * **@CODE@**
!:%>t adv ;																   !NOTLEMMA

!LEXICON plc-SUPADVmus   !!= * **@CODE@**
!:%>mus adv-plc-sup ;													   !NOTLEMMA

!aLEXICON plc-SUPADVmusj   !!= * **@CODE@**
!a:%>muš adv-plc-sup ;													   !NOTLEMMA


!! The main adverb lexicon
LEXICON adv   !!= * **@CODE@** simply gives the tag +Adv and directs to K
+Adv: K ;																   !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON Adverb   !!= * **@CODE@**
fidnen% :fidnen LADJE ;    !NOTLEMMA
vástideaddji% :vástideaddje LADJE-ERR-ORTH ;    !NOTLEMMA !NOTLEMMA
agibeaivvis:agi#beaivvis CSadvFoc/Neg-ge ; !NOTLEMMA
aldda:aldda CSadvFoc/Neg-ge ; !NOTLEMMA
badjel:badjel IL-adv-plc; !
beallálaga:beallá LAGAadv ;
beallálagaid:beallá LAGAIDadv ;
beavddibui:beavddibui adv-plc-comp ;
beavddimusas:beavddimusas adv-plc-sup ;
beavddimussii:beavddimussii adv-plc-sup ;
bissun% :bissun LADJE ;    !NOTLEMMA
buhtadan% :buhtadan DIHTE ;   !NOTLEMMA
bál-bálddalagaid+Err/Orth:bálda#báldda LAGAIDadv ;
bálddalaga+Err/Orth:bálda LAGAadv ; !
dabbil:dabb EL-adv-plc ;
dan% botta+MWE:dan% botta adv-time ;
davveleappos:davve LEAPPOSplc ;
davvelebbui:davve LEBBUIplc ;
davvelit:davvelit adv-plc-comp ;
davveoarjjábeallai:davve#oarjjá#beallai adv-plc ;
diebbil:diebb EL-adv-plc ;
diehttalas+Err/Orth:diehttalaš adv ;
dieppe:dieppe gadv-plc ;
doppe:doppe gadv-plc ;
doppimustá:doppimustá adv-plc-sup ;
duohttáge:duohttáge CSadv ;
duollet% dálle+MWE+Err/Orth-a-á:duollet% dalle adv-time ;
duoppe:duoppe gadv-plc ; !plc
dábbelii:dábbelii adv-plc ;
dálveleappos:dálve LEAPPOStime ;
dálvelebbui:dálve LEBBUItime ;
dáppe:dáppe gadv-plc ; !adv-plc
dáppe+Err/Orth-a-á:dappe gadv-plc ; !adv-plc
dáppimustá:dáppimustá adv-plc-sup ;
eará% :eara LADJE-ERR-ORTH ;    !NOTLEMMA    !NOTLEMMA
easká% :easká LADJE ;    !NOTLEMMA
eastadan% :eastadan DIHTE ;   !NOTLEMMA
fávleleappos:fávle LEAPPOSplc ;
fávlil:fávl EL-adv-plc ;
geasseleappos:geasse LEAPPOStime ;
geasselebbui:geasse LEBBUItime ;
geassit+Use/NG:geasset adv-time ;
gilgalagaid:gilga LAGAIDadv ;
gittalaga:gitta LAGAadv ;
goabbasii:goabbasii CSadvFoc/Neg-ge ; !NOTLEMMA
goabbat% :goabbát LADJE-ERR-ORTH ;    !NOTLEMMA    !NOTLEMMA
goabbelii:goabbelii CSadvFoc/Neg-ge ; !NOTLEMMA
goabbil:goabbil CSadvFoc/Neg-ge ; !NOTLEMMA
goalmmes:goalmmes adv ;
goitge+Err/Orth:goikke CSadv ;
gokko:gokko adv-subqst ;
gos:gos adv-subqst ;
got:got adv-subqst ;
govt+Err/Orth:gokt adv-subqst ; !LIA
guhkkelebbui+Err/Orth:guhke LEBBUIplc ;
guhkálaš:guhkál LAS-adv ;
guovdelebbui:guovde LEBBUIplc ;
guovdil:guovd  EL-adv-time ;
guovdoleappos:guovdo LEAPPOSplc ;
guovtti% :guovtte LADJE-ERR-ORTH ;    !NOTLEMMA
gáddelaš:gáddel LAS-adv-plc ;
hehtten% :hehtten DIHTE ;   !NOTLEMMA
huirat:huirat CSadv ;
hálddahan% :hálddahan LADJE ;    !NOTLEMMA
jitnoseabbot:jitnoseabbot adv-comp ;
loahpageahčen+Err/Orth:loahppa#geahčen adv-time ;
lohkásiid% lohkásiid:lohkásiid% lohkásijd9 adv ;
lulábealde:lulá#bealde adv-plc ;
luovddalagaid:luovdda LAGAIDadv ;
lávžálaga:lávžá LAGAadv ;
man% :man LADJE ;    !NOTLEMMA
mannege:mannege CSadv ;
maŋimusas+Use/NG:maŋemusas adv-time-sup ;
maŋimussii+Use/NG:maŋemussii adv-time-sup ;
maŋimuš+Err/Orth:manjemuš adv-time-sup ;
maŋŋel IL-adv-time ;
maŋŋel+Err/Orth-a-á:máŋŋel IL-adv-plc ;
maŋŋel+Err/Orth-a-á:máŋŋil IL-adv-plc ;
maŋŋelaš:maŋŋel LAS-adv-time ;
maŋŋeleappos:maŋŋe LEAPPOStime ;
maŋŋelebbui:maŋŋe LEBBUItime ;
miehtil:mieht  EL-adv-plc ;
miehtá+Err/Orth:miehttá adv-time-plc ;
guldalan% :guldalan DIHTE ;   !NOTLEMMA
millosepmosit:millosepmosit adv-sup ;
mot:mot adv-subqst ;
muhtimin:muhtimin adv-time ;
máddelebbui:mádde LEBBUIplc ;
máttásnuorttas:máttás#nuorttas adv-plc ;
nabai:nabai CSadv ;
nuortalaš:nuortal LAS-adv-plc ;
nuortaleappos:nuorta LEAPPOSplc ;
oalát:oalát adv ;
oarjelit:oarjelit adv-plc-comp ;
ohcan% :ohcan LADJE ;    !NOTLEMMA
olggobeale:olggo#beale adv-plc ;
ollenge+Err/Orth:ollinge CSadv ;
ovdal:ovdal AL-adv-time ;
ovdalaš:ovdal LAS-adv-time ;
ovdaleappos:ovda LEAPPOStime ;
ovdalebbui:ovda LEBBUItime ;
ovddasguvlui:ovddas#guvluj adv-time-plc ;
ovddasguvlui+MWE+Err/SpaceCmp:ovddas% guvluj adv-time-plc ;
ovddemusas:ovddemusas adv-time-sup ;
ovddosguvlui:ovddos#guvluj adv-time-plc ;
ovddosguvlui+MWE+Err/SpaceCmp:ovddos% guvluj adv-time-plc ;
ovtta% oaivila+Err/MissingSpace:ovtta∑#oaivila adv-time ;
rastá:rastá gadv-plc ;!adv-plc
ravdalaš:ravdal LAS-adv-plc ;
ravdalebbui:ravda LEBBUIplc ;
rekrutteren% :re^krutteren DIHTE ;   !NOTLEMMA
roaibut:roaibut adv-comp ;
ráđđálagaid:ráđđá LAGAIDadv ;
seahkesearválaga:seahke#searvá LAGAadv ;
seaidnelaččas:seaidnelaččas adv-plc-comp ;
seaidnelaš:seaidnel LAS-adv-plc ;
seaidnil:seaidn  EL-adv-plc ;
seamma% :seammá LADJE-ERR-ORTH ;    !NOTLEMMA !+Err/Orth?
sierra:sierra gadv ;
siskkimusas+Err/Orth:siskkimušas adv-plc-sup ;
siste+Err/Orth:sinne adv-plc ;
skábmaleappos:skábma LEAPPOStime ;
soggelaš:soggel LAS-adv-plc ;
soggeleappos:sogge LEAPPOSplc ;
soggelebbui:sogge LEBBUIplc ;
unnimusat:unnimusat adv-sup ;
uskelaš:uskel LAS-adv-plc ;
veahkkálagaid:veahkká LAGAIDadv ;
veastalaččas:veastalaččas adv-plc-comp ;
viidáseappot+Err/Orth:vijdáseppot adv-comp ; !
vuollel:vuollel IL-adv-plc ;
vuollil:vuoll  EL-adv-plc ;
árabuš:árabuš adv-time-comp ;
čalbmálaga:čalbmá LAGAadv ;
čájehan% :čájehan DIHTE ;   !NOTLEMMA
buoremusat adv-sup ;
hoahpubut adv-comp ;
vuolimussii adv-sup ;
harbmes+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:harbmes adv ; ! LIA
lahkaleappos+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:lahka LEAPPOSplc ; ! LIA
rievttabut adv-comp ;
árabut adv-time-comp ;
áramustá adv-time-sup ;
árat adv-time-comp ;
guhkit adv-time-comp ;
guhkibut adv-time-comp ;
dávjámusat adv-sup ;
